Utah statutes.
72-9-401.   Liability of motor carriers for loss or damage to freight.
(1) (a)  A motor carrier receiving property for transportation from one point
in this state to another point in this state shall issue a receipt or bill of
lading for the property, and shall be liable to the lawful holder of the
property for any loss, damage, or injury to the property caused by the motor
carrier, or by any motor carrier to which the property may be delivered or
over whose line or lines the property may pass within this state when
transported on a through bill of lading.
(b)  A contract, receipt, rule, regulation, or other limitation of any
character whatsoever may not exempt the motor carrier from this liability.
(2)  A motor carrier that receives property for transportation or any motor
carrier delivering the property to the consignee shall be liable to the lawful
holder of the receipt or bill of lading, or to any party entitled to recover
on the property whether the receipt or bill of lading has been issued or not,
for the full actual loss, damage or injury to the property caused by the motor
carrier, or by any motor carrier to which the property may have been delivered
or over whose line or lines the property may have passed within this state
when transported on a through bill of lading.
(3) (a)  The provisions of Subsection (2) apply notwithstanding any limitation
of liability or of the amount of recovery, or any representation or agreement
as to the value of the property in any receipt or bill of lading or in any
contract, rule, or regulation.
(b)  Any limitation of liability is unlawful and void if the provisions
respecting liability for full actual loss, damage, or injury notwithstanding
any limitation of liability or of recovery, or any representation or agreement
or release as to value to property, except livestock, received for
transportation concerning which the motor carrier expressly authorizes or
requires, by order of the commission, the establishment and maintenance of
rates dependent upon the value declared in writing by the shipper or agreed to
in writing as the released value of the property.
(c)  The declaration or agreement shall have no other effect than to limit
liability and recovery to an amount not exceeding the value so declared or
agreed upon.
